Tennessee, session 114, SB2492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 41, is amended by adding the following
as a new chapter:
41-5-101.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Alien" means any person who is not a citizen or national of the
United States;
(2) "Correctional institution" means any facility under the authority of a
governmental entity that has the power to detain or restrain, or both, a person
under the laws of this state, including a penal institution as defined in § 39-16-
601. "Correctional institution" also includes such a facility operated by a prison
contractor as defined in § 41-24-102; and
(3) "Governmental entity":
(A) Means any political subdivision of this state ; and
(B) Includes the department of homeland security.
41-5-102.
(a) A governmental entity or prison contractor that operates a correctional
institution may not:
(1) Prevent any of the following persons from entering a correctional
institution used to house aliens, for the purpose of conducting oversight:
SB2492
010807
- 1 -

(A) A member of the United States congress;
(B) An employee of the United States house of representatives or
the United States senate designated by a member of congress for the
purposes of this section;
(C) A member of the house of representatives or a member of the
senate; or
(D) An employee of the house of representatives or the senate
designated by a member of either body for the purposes of this section; or
(2) Make any temporary modification at a correctional institution that
alters what is observed by persons in subdivisions (a)(1)(A)-(D) who visit the
institution for the purpose of conducting oversight, compared to what would be
observed in the absence of such modification.
(b) This section does not require persons in subdivisions (a)(1)(A)-(D) to provide
prior notice of the intent to enter a correctional institution:
(1) For the purpose of conducting oversight;
(2) Where riots have occurred; or
(3) That is the source of such threats as diseases, outbreaks, or
epidemics.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010807